Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-341
Attorney's fees and costs; when allowed.

In any administrative proceeding brought under section 20-336, any court proceeding arising from such a proceeding, or any civil action under section 20-340, the hearing officer or the court, as the case may be, may allow the prevailing party, other than the state, reasonable attorney's fees and costs. The state shall be liable for such fees and costs to the same extent as a private person.

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 42.